Alabama, session 2026rs, HB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. All newly hired employees subject to the
Tuscaloosa County Civil Service System shall serve a
probationary period of 12 months.
Section 2. The Tuscaloosa County Civil Service Board,
as necessary for the efficient operation of county operations,
may adopt rules for the hiring of additional employees who may
work less than full-time.
Section 3. Section 9 of Act 49-357 (Local Acts 1949, p.
524), relating to temporary employees, is repealed.
Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB383 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2